Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2343HH (3) 91 nls/ko H.F. 594 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 529A.1 Definitions. 1 For purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âDiscriminateâ or âdiscriminationâ means a financial 4 institutionâs use of a social credit score to directly or 5 indirectly decline to provide the full and equal enjoyment 6 of financial services to a person, and includes refusing to 7 provide, terminating, or restricting financial services to a 8 person. 9 2. âFinancial institutionâ means any bank incorporated 10 under the provisions of any state or federal law, any savings 11 and loan association incorporated under the provisions of 12 federal law, any credit union organized under the provisions 13 of any state or federal law, and any corporation licensed as 14 an industrial loan company under chapter 536A and that is any 15 of the following: 16 a. A bank with total assets over one hundred billion 17 dollars. 18 b. A payment processor, credit card company, credit card 19 network, payment network, payment service provider, or payment 20 gateway that has processed more than one hundred billion 21 dollars in transactions in the last calendar year. 22 c. An affiliate or subsidiary company of a financial 23 institution. 24 3. âFinancial serviceâ means any financial product or 25 service offered or provided by a financial institution. 26 4. âPersonâ means the same as defined in section 4.1. 27 5. âProtected from government interferenceâ means any 28 speech, religious exercise, association, expression, or conduct 29 protected by the first amendment to the Constitution of the 30 United States, Article I of the Constitution of the State of 31 Iowa, or federal or state law. âProtected from government 32 interferenceâ does not include any speech, religious exercise, 33 association, expression, or conduct that the United States 34 supreme court, as of July 1, 2025, has expressly held is not 35 -1- LSB 2343HH (3) 91 nls/ko 1/ 6 H.F. 594 protected by the first amendment to the Constitution of the 1 United States, Article I of the Constitution of the State of 2 Iowa, or federal or state law. 3 6. a. âSocial credit scoreâ means an analysis, rating, 4 scoring, list, or tabulation that evaluates any of the 5 following: 6 (1) A personâs speech, religious exercise, association, 7 expression, or conduct protected by the first amendment 8 to the Constitution of the United States, Article I of the 9 Constitution of the State of Iowa, or federal or state law. 10 (2) A personâs failure or refusal to do any of the 11 following: 12 (a) Adopt targets or disclosures related to greenhouse gas 13 emissions beyond targets or disclosures required by state and 14 federal law. 15 (b) Conduct a racial, diversity, or gender audit or 16 disclosure, or provide a quota, preference, or benefit based 17 on race, diversity, or gender. 18 (c) Facilitate or assist an employee in obtaining an 19 abortion or gender reassignment services. 20 (3) A personâs participation in business activities related 21 to a manufacturer or dealer of firearms and ammunition, or 22 business activities with an oil or gas company. 23 (4) A personâs status as an elected official or a personâs 24 status as a politically exposed person. 25 b. âSocial credit scoreâ shall not include a financial 26 institutionâs evaluation of a personâs quantifiable financial 27 risks based on impartial, financial-risk-based standards if 28 such standards are established in advance by the financial 29 institution and publicly disclosed to customers and potential 30 customers. 31 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 529A.2 Discrimination prohibited. 32 1. A financial institution shall not discriminate in the 33 provision of financial services to a person or agree, conspire, 34 or coordinate, directly or indirectly, including through an 35 -2- LSB 2343HH (3) 91 nls/ko 2/ 6 H.F. 594 intermediary or third party, with another person, or group of 1 persons, to discriminate in the provision of financial services 2 to a person. 3 2. If a financial institution refuses to provide, 4 restricts, or terminates financial services to a person, within 5 ninety days of the refusal, restriction, or termination, the 6 person may request a written statement that specifies the 7 reason for the financial institutionâs refusal to provide, or 8 restriction or termination of, the personâs financial services. 9 a. The person may request the statement from a customer 10 service or designated account representative of the financial 11 institution by phone, mail, or electronic mail. The person 12 shall provide the financial institution with a mailing address 13 and an electronic mail address where the statement can be sent. 14 The financial institution shall transmit the statement by mail 15 or electronic mail within fourteen business days of receiving 16 the personâs request. 17 b. The financial institutionâs statement shall include all 18 of the following: 19 (1) A detailed explanation of the basis for the denial, 20 restriction, or termination of the personâs financial services, 21 including a description of the personâs speech, religious 22 exercise, business activity with a particular industry, or 23 other conduct that was, in whole or in part, the basis of the 24 financial institutionâs decision. 25 (2) A copy of the terms of service agreed upon, if any, by 26 the financial institution and the person to whom the financial 27 institution refuses to provide, or restricts or terminates, 28 financial services, and a citation to the specific provision 29 of the terms of service upon which the financial institution 30 relied to refuse to provide, or to restrict or terminate, 31 financial services. 32 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 529A.3 Enforcement ââ penalties. 33 1. If the attorney general has reasonable belief that a 34 financial institution is in violation of this chapter, the 35 -3- LSB 2343HH (3) 91 nls/ko 3/ 6 H.F. 594 attorney general may bring a civil action to enforce the 1 provisions of this chapter. Upon finding that a financial 2 institution violated this chapter, a court may order any of the 3 following: 4 a. Injunctive relief as necessary to enforce compliance with 5 this chapter. 6 b. Other remedies permitted under the law. 7 c. Damages, restitution, or other compensation on behalf of 8 residents of the state, not to exceed the amount provided by 9 subsection 2, paragraph âaâ . 10 2. A person harmed by a violation of this chapter by a 11 financial institution may bring a civil action, and upon 12 finding that a financial institution violated this chapter, a 13 court may order any of the following: 14 a. Actual damages not to exceed ten thousand dollars, 15 except if the court finds that the violation by the financial 16 institution was willful, damages in an amount equal to three 17 times the amount of actual damages, but not to exceed thirty 18 thousand dollars, in addition to reasonable attorney fees and 19 court costs. 20 b. Injunctive relief as necessary to enforce compliance with 21 this chapter. 22